Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4551.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) The Michigan commission on law enforcement standards is created to carry out the intent of this act. The commission is transferred as a type I transfer pursuant to section 3 of the executive organization act of 1965, 1965 PA 380, MCL 16.103, to the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (2) The commission consists of the following members: (a) The attorney general, or his or her the attorney general's designated representative from within the department of attorney general. (b) The director of the department of state police, or his or her the director's designated representative who is a police officer within the department of state police. (c) The chief of a police department of a city that has a population of more than 600,000, or his or her the chief's designee who is a command officer within that department. (d) The following members appointed by the governor, subject to the advice and consent of the senate under section 6 of article V of the state constitution of 1963, as follows: (i) Three individuals nominated by the Michigan Association of Chiefs of Police. (ii) Three individuals nominated by the Michigan Sheriffs' Association. (iii) One individual nominated by the Prosecuting Attorneys Association of Michigan. (iv) One individual nominated by the Criminal Defense Attorneys of Michigan. (v) One individual nominated by the Michigan State Police Troopers Association. (vi) One individual nominated by the Michigan chapter of the Fraternal Order of Police. (vii) One individual nominated by the Police Officers Association of Michigan. (viii) One individual nominated by a police association not otherwise represented on the commission representing law enforcement officers employed by a law enforcement agency employing more than 10% of the police officers in this state. (ix) One individual nominated by the Police Officers Labor Council of Michigan. (x) One individual nominated by the Michigan Association of Police. (xi) One individual nominated by the Deputy Sheriff's Association of Michigan. (xii) One non-law enforcement individual representing the public. (3) The terms of the members of the commission who were previously appointed by the governor and serving on the commission on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection January 2, 2017 expire on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection.January 2, 2017. (4) Not more than 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, later than April 2, 2017, the governor shall appoint members to the commission as provided in subsection (2)(d). (5) The governor may appoint any individual meeting the membership requirements of the organizations listed in subsection (2)(d)(i) to (xii) if the organization permitted to nominate an individual to the commission fails to provide a nominee not less than 30 days before a vacancy created by the expiration of a term, or not less than 30 days after the effective date of any other vacancy. (6) An individual selected under subsection (2)(d) shall serve as a commission member only while serving as a member of the organization that submitted his or her the individual's name to the governor for appointment. (7) Members of the commission appointed or reappointed under subsection (2)(d)(i) to (xii) shall must be appointed for a term of 4 years. except that, of the members first appointed to the commission, 6 shall serve for 1 year, 5 shall serve for 2 years, and 5 shall serve for 3 years. (8) The expiration dates of appointments under subsection (2)(d) shall be are December 31 of the calendar year in which they expire. (9) A vacancy on the commission occurring other than by expiration of a term shall must be filled by the governor in the same manner as the original appointment for the balance of the unexpired term.